Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 19. Health, Safety, and Welfare

§ 21-19-1.
General powers of municipal governing authorities; collection and disposal of garbage and rubbish.

The municipal governing authorities of any municipality shall have the power to make regulations to secure the general health of the municipality; to prevent, remove, and abate nuisances; to regulate or prohibit the construction of privy vaults and cesspools, and to regulate or suppress those already constructed; to compel and regulate the connection of all property with sewers and drains; to suppress hog pens, slaughterhouses and stockyards, or to regulate the same and prescribe and enforce regulations for cleaning and keeping the same in order; to regulate and prescribe and enforce regulations for the cleaning and keeping in order of warehouses, stables, alleys, yards, private ways, outhouses, and other places where offensive matter is kept or permitted to accumulate; and to compel and regulate the removal of garbage and filth beyond the corporate limits. The municipal governing authorities are further authorized to adopt and enforce regulations governing the disposal of garbage and rubbish in sanitary landfills owned or leased by the municipality, whether located within or outside of the corporate limits of the municipality, to the extent that such regulations are not in conflict with or prohibited by regulations of the Commission on Environmental Quality adopted under Section 17-17-27.

After December 31, 1992, the governing body of any municipality in the state shall provide for the collection and disposal of garbage and the disposal of rubbish, and for that purpose the governing body shall have the power to:

Establish, operate and maintain a garbage and/or rubbish collection and disposal system or systems;

Acquire property, real or personal, by contract, gift or purchase, necessary or proper for the maintenance and operation of such system;

Make all necessary rules and regulations for the collection and disposal of garbage and/or rubbish not in conflict with or prohibited by rules and regulations of the Commission on Environmental Quality adopted under Section 17-17-27 and, if it so desires, establish, maintain and collect rates, fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish; and

In its discretion, enter into contracts, in the manner required by law, with individuals, associations or corporations for the establishment, operation and maintenance of a garbage or rubbish disposal system or systems, and/or enter into contracts on such terms as the municipal governing body thinks proper with any other municipality, county or region enabling the municipality to use jointly with such other municipality, county or region any authorized rubbish landfill or permitted sanitary landfill operated by the other municipality, other county or region.

As a necessary incident to such municipal governing authority’s power and authority to establish, maintain and collect such rates, fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and as a necessary incident to such municipal governing authority’s power and authority to establish, operate and maintain a garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems, the municipal governing authority of such municipality shall have the authority to initiate a civil action to recover any delinquent fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such rubbish, and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, in the event any person, firm or corporation, including any municipal corporation, shall fail or refuse to pay such fees and charges for collecting and disposing of garbage and/or rubbish; provided that such municipal governing authority may initiate such a civil action to recover such delinquent fees and charges whether or not such municipality has previously entered into a contract with such individual, firm or corporation, relating to the establishment, operation and maintenance of such garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems; provided further, that in a civil action to recover such delinquent fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, the municipality shall in all respects be a proper party to such suit as plaintiff and shall have the power to sue for and recover such unpaid fees and charges, and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges from any person, firm or corporation, as may fail, refuse or default in the payment of such fees and charges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2928; 1906, § 3319; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5816; 1930, § 2396; 1942, § 3374-116; Laws, 1950, ch 491, § 116; Laws, 1982, ch. 405, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 581, § 30; Laws, 1992, ch. 583 § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

§ 21-19-2.
Development of billing and collection system; defraying costs; increase in ad valorem tax; notice; joint and several liability of generator and property owner; liens.

To defray the cost of establishing, operating and maintaining the system provided for in Section 21-19-1, the governing authority of a municipality may develop a system for the billing and/or collection of any fees or charges imposed on each person furnished garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal service by the municipality or at the expense of the municipality. The governing authority of the municipality shall provide for the collection of the fees or charges.

The governing authority of a municipality may enter into a contract upon mutual agreement with a public or private corporation, nonprofit corporation, planning and development district or a public agency, association, utility or utility district within the area receiving garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services from the municipality for the purpose of developing, maintaining, operating and administering a system for the billing and/or collection of fees or charges imposed by the municipality for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services. The entity with whom the governing authority of a municipality contracts shall notify the governing authority of the municipality monthly of any unpaid fees or charges assessed under this section. Any entity that contracts to provide a service to customers, within the area being served by the municipality’s garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system, may provide a list of its customers to the governing authority of the municipality upon the request of the governing authority.

To defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 21-19-1, the governing body of a municipality may levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed four (4) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the municipality’s garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system. The service area may be comprised of incorporated and/or unincorporated areas within a county; however, no property shall be subject to this levy unless that property is within an area served by a municipality’s garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system. The rate of the ad valorem tax levied under this section shall be shown as a line item on the notice of ad valorem taxes on taxable property owed by the taxpayer.

In addition to or in lieu of any other method authorized to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 21-19-1, the governing body of a municipality that has established a garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system may assess and collect fees or charges to defray the costs of such services. The governing authority may assess and collect the fees or charges from each single family residential generator of garbage and/or rubbish. The governing authority also may assess and collect such fees or charges from each industrial, commercial and multi-family residential generator of garbage and/or rubbish for any time period that the generator has not otherwise contracted for the collection of garbage and/or rubbish that is ultimately disposed of at a permitted or authorized nonhazardous solid waste management facility.

Before the adoption of any resolution or ordinance to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section, the governing authority of a municipality shall have published a notice advertising their intent to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section. The notice shall specify the purpose of the proposed increase, the proposed percentage increase and the proposed percentage increase in total revenues for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services or shall contain a copy of any resolution by the governing authority stating their intent to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section. The notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality for no less than three (3) consecutive weeks before the adoption of the order. The notice shall be in print no less than the size of eighteen (18) point and shall be surrounded by a one-fourth (1/4) inch black border. The notice shall not be placed in the legal section notice of the newspaper. There shall be no language in the notice inferring a mandate from the Legislature.

In addition to the requirement for publication of notice, the governing authority of a municipality shall notify each person furnished garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal service of any increase in the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section. In the case of an increase of the ad valorem tax assessment, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first ad valorem tax bill on which the increased assessment is effective. In the case of an increase in fees or charges, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first bill for fees or charges on which the increased fees or charges are assessed. There shall be no language in any notice inferring a mandate from the Legislature.

The governing authority of a municipality may adopt an ordinance authorizing the granting of exemptions from the fees or charges for certain generators of garbage and/or rubbish. The ordinance shall define clearly those generators that may be exempted and shall be interpreted consistently by the governing authority when determining whether to grant or withhold requested exemptions.

The governing authority may borrow money for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the system in anticipation of:

The tax levy authorized under this section;

Revenues resulting from the assessment of any fees or charges for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal; or

Any combination thereof.

Fees or charges for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal shall be assessed jointly and severally against the generator of the garbage and/or rubbish and against the owner of the property furnished the service. However, any person who pays, as a part of a rental or lease agreement, an amount for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services shall not be held liable upon the failure of the property owner to pay such fees.

Every generator assessed the fees or charges provided for and limited by this section and the owner of the property occupied by that generator shall be jointly and severally liable for the fees and/or charges so assessed. The fees or charges shall be a lien upon the real property offered garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal service.

At the discretion of the governing body of the municipality, fees or charges assessed for the service may be assessed annually. If fees or charges are assessed annually, the fees or charges for each calendar year shall be a lien upon the real property offered the service beginning on January 1 of the next immediately succeeding calendar year. The person or entity owing the fees or charges, upon signing a form provided by the governing authority, may pay the fees or charges in equal installments.

If fees or charges so assessed are assessed on a basis other than annually, the fees or charges shall become a lien on the real property offered the service on the date that the fees or charges become due and payable.

No real or personal property shall be sold to satisfy any lien imposed under this section.

The municipality shall mail a notice of the lien, including the amount of unpaid fees or charges and a description of the property subject to the lien, to the owner of the property subject to the lien.

The municipal governing body shall notify the county tax collector of any unpaid fees or charges assessed under this section within ninety (90) days after such fees or charges are due. Upon receipt of a delinquency notice, the tax collector shall not issue or renew a motor vehicle road and bridge privilege license for any motor vehicle owned by a person who is delinquent in the payment of fees or charges, unless such fees or charges, in addition to any other taxes or fees assessed against the motor vehicle, are paid.

Liens created under this section may be discharged as follows:

By filing with the municipal tax collector a receipt or acknowledgement, signed by the municipality, that the lien has been paid or discharged; or

By depositing with the municipal tax collector money equal to the amount of the claim, which money shall be held for the benefit of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 624, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 21-19-3.
Controlling contagious or infectious diseases; establishing pesthouses.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to make regulations to prevent the introduction and spread of contagious or infectious diseases; to make quarantine laws for that purpose, and to enforce the same within five miles of the corporate limits; and to establish pesthouses outside the corporate limits, and to provide for the support and government of the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2950; 1906, § 3341; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5838; 1930, § 2417; 1942, § 3374-132; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 132; Laws, 1964, ch. 496, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1964).

§ 21-19-5.
Establishing hospitals, workhouses, and houses of correction.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to erect, establish and regulate hospitals, workhouses, and houses of correction in the corporate limits, or within three miles thereof, and to provide for the government and support of same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2962; 1906, § 3358; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5855; 1930, § 2435; 1942, § 3374-144; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 144, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-19-7.
Donating to hospitals and benevolent institutions.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to donate a sum, not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per month, to maintain a charity ward or wards in any hospital situated in the same county in which such municipality is located.

All municipalities within the several counties of this state bordering on the tidewater of the Gulf of Mexico, are hereby authorized and empowered, in the discretion of the proper authorities thereof, to appropriate such a sum of money as said authorities shall deem reasonable, to provide and maintain a charity ward or wards, in any of the hospitals in said municipalities, or, in the discretion of said authorities, to make and enter into contracts with any such hospitals for the treatment and care in such hospitals of the indigent sick of said municipalities, and to pay therefor out of the general fund of such municipalities such sum or sums, as shall be a reasonable and just compensation to said hospital.

In addition, the governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power and authority to donate and furnish free of charge lights, power and water from municipally-owned electric light and water plants to hospitals or benevolent institutions located within any such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2962; 1906, § 3358; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3798, 3810, 3811, 5855; Hemingway’s 1921 Supp § 3811c; 1930, §§ 290, 2435; 1942, §§ 2998, 3374-144; Laws, 1908, ch. 134; Laws, 1916, chs. 143, 235; Laws, 1918, ch. 205; Laws, 1920, ch. 289; Laws, 1922, ch. 302; Laws, 1924, chs. 217, 222; Laws, 1926, chs. 204, 212, 305, 306; Laws, 1928, chs. 233, 236; Laws, 1930, chs. 33, 56, 185; Laws, 1938, chs. 299, 326; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 144; Laws, 1956, ch. 181; Laws, 1958, ch. 212; Laws, 1962, ch. 251, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 21-19-9.
Controlling running of animals at large; establishment of city pounds; cooperative agreements.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to prevent or regulate the running at large of animals of all kinds, and to cause such as may be running at large to be impounded and sold to discharge the costs and penalties provided for the violation of such regulations and the expense of impounding and keeping and selling the same; to regulate and provide for the taxing of owners and harborers of dogs, and to destroy dogs running at large, unless such dogs have proper identification indicating that said dogs have been vaccinated for rabies; and to provide for the erection of all needful pens, pounds and buildings for the use of the municipality, within or without the municipal limits, and to appoint and confirm keepers thereof, and to establish and enforce rules governing the same.

The governing authorities of municipalities may enter into pacts, agreements or contracts with other municipalities to provide for cooperation in the use or erection of all pens, pounds and buildings to prevent or regulate the running at large of animals of all kinds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2975; 1906, § 3370; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5867; 1930, § 2448; 1942, § 3374-153; Laws, 1896, p. 188; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 153; Laws, 1980, ch. 326 eff from and after July 1, 1980.

§ 21-19-11.
Determination that property or parcel of land is menace; authorized municipal employee may make the determination that property or parcel of land is menace under certain circumstances; notification to property owner; hearing; cleaning private property; cost and penalty as assessment against property; appeal.

To determine whether property or parcel of land located within a municipality is in such a state of uncleanliness as to be a menace to the public health, safety and welfare of the community, a governing authority of any municipality shall conduct a hearing, on its own motion, or upon the receipt of a petition signed by a majority of the residents residing within four hundred (400) feet of any property or parcel of land alleged to be in need of the cleaning. Notice shall be provided to the property owner by:

United States mail two (2) weeks before the date of the hearing mailed to the address of the subject property and to the address where the ad valorem tax notice for such property is sent by the office charged with collecting ad valorem tax; and

Posting notice for at least two (2) weeks before the date of a hearing on the property or parcel of land alleged to be in need of cleaning and at city hall or another place in the municipality where such notices are posted.

Any notice required by this section shall include language that informs the property owner that an adjudication at the hearing that the property or parcel of land is in need of cleaning will authorize the municipality to reenter the property or parcel of land for a period of one (1) year after final adjudication without any further hearing if notice is posted on the property or parcel of land and at city hall or another place in the municipality where such notices are generally posted at least seven (7) days before the property or parcel of land is reentered for cleaning. A copy of the required notice mailed and posted as required by this section shall be recorded in the minutes of the governing authority in conjunction with the hearing required by this section.

If, at such hearing, the governing authority shall adjudicate the property or parcel of land in its then condition to be a menace to the public health, safety and welfare of the community, the governing authority, if the owner does not do so himself, shall proceed to clean the land, by the use of municipal employees or by contract, by cutting grass and weeds; filling cisterns; removing rubbish, abandoned or dilapidated fences, outside toilets, abandoned or dilapidated buildings, slabs, personal property, which removal of personal property shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 21-39-21, and other debris; and draining cesspools and standing water therefrom. The governing authority may by resolution adjudicate the actual cost of cleaning the property and may also impose a penalty not to exceed One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) or fifty percent (50%) of the actual cost, whichever is more. The cost and any penalty may become a civil debt against the property owner, and/or, at the option of the governing authority, an assessment against the property. The “cost assessed against the property” means either the cost to the municipality of using its own employees to do the work or the cost to the municipality of any contract executed by the municipality to have the work done, and administrative costs and legal costs of the municipality. For subsequent cleaning within the one-year period after the date of the hearing at which the property or parcel of land was adjudicated in need of cleaning, upon seven (7) days’ notice posted both on the property or parcel of land adjudicated in need of cleaning and at city hall or another place in the municipality where such notices are generally posted, and consistent with the municipality’s adjudication as authorized in this subsection (1), a municipality may reenter the property or parcel of land to maintain cleanliness without further notice or hearing no more than six (6) times in any twelve-month period with respect to removing abandoned or dilapidated buildings, slabs, dilapidated fences and outside toilets, and no more than twelve (12) times in any twenty-four-month period with respect to cutting grass and weeds and removing rubbish, personal property and other debris on the land, and the expense of cleaning of the property, except as otherwise provided in this section for removal of hazardous substances, shall not exceed an aggregate amount of Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) per year, or the fair market value of the property subsequent to cleaning, whichever is more. The aggregate cost of removing hazardous substances will be the actual cost of such removal to the municipality and shall not be subject to the Twenty Thousand Dollar ($20,000.00) limitation provided in this subsection. The governing authority may assess the same penalty for each time the property or land is cleaned as otherwise provided in this section. The penalty provided herein shall not be assessed against the State of Mississippi upon request for reimbursement under Section 29-1-145, nor shall a municipality clean a parcel owned by the State of Mississippi without first giving notice.

When the fee or cost to clean property or a parcel of land that is one (1) acre or less does not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00), excluding administrative costs, and the property or parcel is located within a municipality having a population over twenty-five thousand (25,000), the governing authority of the municipality may authorize one or more of its employees to determine whether the property or parcel of land is in such a state of uncleanliness as to be a menace to the public health, safety and welfare of the community and the determination made by the authorized municipal employee shall be set forth and recorded in the minutes of the governing authority. Notice of this determination shall be provided to the property owner by:

United States mail seven (7) days before the date of cleaning of the property or parcel of land mailed to the address of the subject property and to the address where the ad valorem tax notice for such property is sent by the office charged with collecting ad valorem tax; and

Posting notice for at least seven (7) days before the cleaning of the property or parcel of land and at city hall or another place in the municipality where such notices are posted.

Any notice required by this subsection shall include language that informs the property owner that the appropriate municipal official has determined that the property or parcel of land is a menace to the public health, safety and welfare of the community and in need of cleaning and the municipality is authorized to enter the property for cleaning and that the municipality is further authorized to reenter the property or parcel of land for a period of one (1) year after this cleaning without any further hearing or action if notice is posted on the property or parcel of land and at city hall or another place in the municipality where such notices are generally posted at least seven (7) days before the property or parcel of land is reentered for cleaning. A copy of the required notice mailed and posted as required by this subsection shall be recorded in the minutes of the governing authority in conjunction with the determination made by the municipal employee in this subsection (2).

If an authorized municipal employee determines that the condition of property or parcel of land is a menace to the public health, safety and welfare of the community, the governing authority, if the owner does not do so himself, shall proceed to clean the land, by the use of municipal employees or by contract, by cutting grass and weeds; filling cisterns; removing rubbish, abandoned or dilapidated fences, outside toilets, abandoned or dilapidated buildings, slabs, personal property, which removal of personal property shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 21-39-21, and other debris; and draining cesspools and standing water therefrom. The governing authority shall by resolution adjudicate the actual cost of cleaning the property under this provision, provided the same does not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00). The cost may become a civil debt against the property owner, and/or, at the option of the governing authority, an assessment against the property. The “cost assessed against the property” means either the cost to the municipality of using its own employees to do the work or the cost to the municipality of any contract executed by the municipality to have the work done, and additionally may include administrative costs of the municipality not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00). For subsequent cleaning within the one-year period set forth in this subsection (2), upon seven (7) days’ notice posted both on the property or parcel of land adjudicated in need of cleaning and at city hall or another place in the municipality where such notices are generally posted, and consistent with the municipal official’s determination as authorized in this subsection (2), a municipality may reenter the property or parcel of land to maintain cleanliness without further notice or hearing under this subsection (2) no more than six (6) times in any twelve-month period with respect to removing abandoned or dilapidated buildings, slabs, dilapidated fences and outside toilets, and no more than twelve (12) times in any twenty-four-month period with respect to cutting grass and weeds and removing rubbish, personal property and other debris on the land, and the expense of cleaning of the property shall not exceed an aggregate amount of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per year under this subsection (2). The governing authority may assess the same penalty for each time the property or land is cleaned as otherwise provided in this subsection (2). The penalty provided herein shall not be assessed against the State of Mississippi upon request for reimbursement under Section 29-1-145, nor shall a municipality clean a parcel owned by the State of Mississippi without first giving notice. A determination made by an appropriate municipal employee under this subsection (2) that the state or condition of property or a parcel of land is a menace to the public health, safety and welfare of the community shall not subsequently be used to replace a hearing if subsection (1) of this section is later utilized by a municipality when the prerequisites of this subsection (2) are not satisfied.

If the governing authority declares, by resolution, that the cost and any penalty shall be collected as a civil debt, the governing authority may authorize the institution of a suit on open account against the owner of the property in a court of competent jurisdiction in the manner provided by law for the cost and any penalty, plus court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and interest from the date that the property was cleaned.

If the governing authority declares that the cost and any penalty shall be collected as an assessment against the property, then the assessment above provided for shall be a lien against the property and may be enrolled in the office of the circuit clerk of the county as other judgments are enrolled, and the tax collector of the municipality shall, upon order of the board of governing authorities, proceed to sell the land to satisfy the lien as now provided by law for the sale of lands for delinquent municipal taxes. The lien against the property shall be an encumbrance upon the property and shall follow title of the property.

All assessments levied under the provisions of this section shall be included with municipal ad valorem taxes and payment shall be enforced in the same manner in which payment is enforced for municipal ad valorem taxes, and all statutes regulating the collection of other taxes in a municipality shall apply to the enforcement and collection of the assessments levied under the provisions of this section, including utilization of the procedures authorized under Sections 17-13-9(2) and 27-41-2.

All assessments levied under the provisions of this section shall become delinquent at the same time municipal ad valorem taxes become delinquent. Delinquencies shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time delinquent ad valorem taxes are collected and shall bear the same penalties as those provided for delinquent taxes. If the property is sold for the nonpayment of an assessment under this section, it shall be sold in the manner that property is sold for the nonpayment of delinquent ad valorem taxes. If the property is sold for delinquent ad valorem taxes, the assessment under this section shall be added to the delinquent tax and collected at the same time and in the same manner.

All decisions rendered under the provisions of this section may be appealed in the same manner as other appeals from municipal boards or courts are taken. However, an appeal from a decision of a municipal officer or official shall be made to the governing authority and such appeal shall be in writing, state the basis for the appeal and be filed with the city clerk no later than seven (7) days from the latest date of notice required under this section.

Nothing contained under this section shall prevent any municipality from enacting criminal penalties for failure to maintain property so as not to constitute a menace to public health, safety and welfare.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 2456, 2457; 1942, § 3374-171; Laws, 1922, ch. 220; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 171; Laws, 1962, ch. 545; Laws, 1964, ch. 498; Laws, 1966, ch. 593, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 335; Laws, 1977, ch. 330; Laws, 1985, ch. 350; Laws, 1987, ch. 321; Laws, 1989, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 479 § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 473, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 2, 2014.); Laws, 2018, ch. 376, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 21-19-12.
Lien amnesty for nonprofits and others interested in developing blighted real estate.

The governing authority of any municipality may forgive liens imposed on real property for the costs, fines, penalties and other assessments associated with the municipality’s cleaning of real property pursuant to Section 21-19-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, subject to the following:

The real property must be in a blighted condition if it has been vacant and in a deteriorated condition which necessitated the municipality’s imposition of a lien in order to correct specific code violations.

The liens imposed by the municipality must have been in existence and declared uncollectible for a period of at least two (2) years.

The real property must be purchased by a nonprofit entity or for-profit developer and converted from its blighted condition. For purposes of this section, “nonprofit” entity means an association, organization, or corporation which is a nonprofit organization in accordance with Section 501(c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code and provides proof of its tax exempt status. “For-profit developer” means an individual partnership or corporation other than the real property’s owner who purchases property considered to be in blighted condition and converts it to productive use.

The nonprofit entity or for-profit developer must have obtained the blighted estate for a sum not exceeding seventy percent (70%) of the real estate’s appraised value.

The for-profit developer or nonprofit entity must file an application with the municipality seeking lien amnesty. The application must include the following:

The contract of sale;

Appraisal reports from two (2) reputable real estate appraisers; and

Plans for the real estate’s development and anticipated use.

The for-profit developer or nonprofit entity may be granted conditional lien amnesty and allowed eighteen (18) months to develop the blighted real property. For good cause shown, the municipality may allow the for profit developer or nonprofit entity an additional six (6) to twelve (12) months to develop the blighted property.

If the blighted property remains undeveloped after eighteen (18) months and the municipality has not extended the period for development of the real estate, the nonprofit entity or for-profit developer must pay the principal amount of the municipality’s lien plus interest at the rate of eight percent (8%) per annum.

If the nonprofit entity or for-profit developer desires to sell or dispose of the real property prior to its development, the nonprofit entity or for-profit developer must first obtain the municipality’s approval. If the municipality approves the sale or disposal of the real estate prior to development, the nonprofit entity or for-profit developer shall pay the principal amount of the lien on or before the closing date of the sale unless a subsequent purchaser of the blighted real property has applied for and been granted conditional lien amnesty.

If a for-profit developer or nonprofit entity sells or disposes of the real property prior to development from its blighted condition without the municipality’s approval, then the for-profit developer or nonprofit entity shall be liable to the city for the principal amount of the lien plus interest at the rate of eight percent (8%), and a penalty of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) will also be assessed against the developer.

Conditional lien amnesty may not be sold, conveyed, transferred or assigned.

No lien imposed upon real property pursuant to the provisions of Section 21-19-11 shall be finally released until real property in a blighted condition has been developed according to plan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 375, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 21-19-13.
Changes of streams and bridges; clean drainage ditches and prevent erosion; levying taxes to pay for authorized works.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to establish, alter and change the channels of streams or other water courses, and to bridge the same, whenever so to do will promote the health, comfort and convenience of the inhabitants of such municipality.

The governing authorities of any municipality shall also have the power and authority to incur costs and pay necessary expenses in providing labor, materials and supplies to clean or clear drainage ditches, creeks or channels, whether on public or private property, and to incur costs and pay necessary expenses in providing labor, materials and supplies in order to prevent erosion where such erosion has been caused or will be caused by such drainage ditches, creeks or channels. This paragraph shall not impose any obligation or duty upon the municipality and shall not create any additional rights for the benefit of any owner of public or private property.

No additional taxes shall be imposed for the works authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section until the governing authorities shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention to levy the taxes and establishing the amount of the tax levies and the date on which the taxes initially will be levied and collected. This date shall be the first day of a month but not earlier than the first day of the second month from the date of adoption of the resolution. Notice of the proposed tax levies shall be published once each week for at least three (3) weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality. The first publication of the notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date fixed in the resolution on which the governing authorities propose to levy the taxes, and the last publication of the notice shall be made not more than seven (7) days before that date. If, within the time of giving notice, fifteen percent (15%) or two thousand five hundred (2,500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the municipality file a written petition against the levy of the taxes, then the taxes shall not be levied unless authorized by three-fifths (3/5) of the qualified electors of the municipality voting at an election to be called and held for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2936; 1906, § 3327; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5824; 1930, § 2404; 1942, § 3374-122; Laws, 1900, ch. 122; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 122; Laws, 1990, ch. 308, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 510, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.